District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.05

Repealed

Notice of registration of order.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 605, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(j), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(5), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-346.5.
D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (b), substituted “A notice” for “The notice”; redesignated subsec. (c) as subsec. (d); and added subsec. (c).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 29, 1998, 45 DCR 1950.
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 605 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).